troff/libhnj/hyphen.d/hyph_en_US.dic
UTF-8
% -*- tex -*- vim: ft=tex
% This file has been derived from Donald Knuth's `hyphen.tex',
% to which the following applies:
% -----------------------------------------------------------------
% The Plain TeX hyphenation tables [NOT TO BE CHANGED IN ANY WAY!]
% Unlimited copying and redistribution of this file are permitted as long
% as this file is not modified. Modifications are permitted, but only if
% the resulting file is not named hyphen.tex.
% -----------------------------------------------------------------
% A copy of the original can be obtained from <http://www.tug.org/teTeX/>.
% -----------------------------------------------------------------
% For sending bug reports, follow the instructions on
% <http://n-t-roff.github.io/heirloom/doctools.html>.
% -----------------------------------------------------------------
% Sccsid @(#)hyph_en_US.dic	1.2 (gritter) 9/3/05
.1ca
.1ci2
.1co
.1do
.1du
.1fo
.1g2i5a
.1ga2
.1gen
.1geo
.1go
.1ma
.1mo
.1mu
.1ta4
.1tim
.1to
.2a2r
.2ang4
.2c1it
.2ch4
.2e1b4
.2i2n3s2
.2id
.2ine2
.2p2ed
.2s1in
.2t1in
.2tab
.2us
.3di2c1t
.3p2i1o
.3s4c2i3e4
.3ten5a2n
.4a1ma
.4bes4
.4eu3
.4i4n2k2
.4ir
.4oth3
.5se2l2f5
.a1to
.a2ch4
.a2d
.a2f
.a2f1t
.a2n
.a2s1s
.a2tom5
.a4l3t
.a4r5s2
.ad1d4
.ad4der
.am5at
.an1i5m
.an1t4
.an3te
.an5c
.ant2i
.anti5s
.ar1ti
.ar4t2ie4
.ar4ty
.as1p
.as1so
.as3c
.as9s8o9c8i8a8t8es.
.as9s8o9c8i8a8te.
.asso1ci
.asso3c2i1a
.aster5
.au1d
.av4i
.awn4
.b4e5s2to
.ba2n
.ba4g
.ba5na
.bas4e
.be3s1m
.be5r1a
.ber4
.bri2
.bu4t3t2
.but4ti
.c2a2r
.ca1pa
.ca2n
.ca4m1p
.ca4t
.cam4pe
.can5c
.capa5b
.car5ol
.ce4la
.ch4il2
.chil1l
.chill5i
.cit5r
.co3e2
.co4r
.cor5n1er
.corn2e
.d4em
.de1c4l4
.de1mo
.de1s4c
.de3o
.de3r1a
.de3r1i
.de4moi2
.de8c9l8i9n8a9t8i8on.
.decl4i1na
.declin2at
.declina1t2io
.declinatio2n
.des2
.dic1t2io5
.do4t
.du4c
.du4m1b5
.e1na
.e1q
.e2a2r
.e2l5d
.e2n3s2
.ear2t
.earth5
.eas3i
.eer4
.eg2
.el3em
.en3g
.enam3
.eq2ui2
.eq5ui5t
.equ2
.er1r4
.er4ri
.es3
.eye5
.fes3
.fo2r
.for1m
.for2me
.for5mer
.ge2
.ge5o2g
.gen3t4
.gi4b
.go4r
.h1es3
.h2ero
.h2ie4
.h4and
.ha2n
.ha4n5k2
.hand5i
.he2
.he4t3
.hero5i2
.hi3b
.hi3er
.ho2n
.hon3o
.hon5ey
.hov5
.i1do
.i4m1p
.id4l
.idol3
.im2pi
.im3m
.im5p1i2n
.in1
.in3ci
.ir5r4
.is4i
.ju3r
.l1i4t
.l2i3o
.l2i4g
.l4ath5
.la4cy
.la4m
.lat5er
.le2
.leg5e
.len4
.lep5
.lev1
.li1g5a
.li2n
.m2a2r
.m2is1
.ma1g5a5
.ma1n5a
.ma2n
.mal5o
.mar5ti
.me1te
.me2
.me5ter
.mer3c
.mis4t5i
.mo2n
.mo2r
.mo3ro
.mon3e
.mu2ta5b
.mu5ta
.ni4c
.o1ra
.o2ft
.ob2l2
.ob8l8i8g9a9t8o8ry.
.obl2ig
.obli1ga
.obliga1to
.obligato1ry
.od1d5
.od2
.of5te
.or1d
.or3c
.or3t
.or5a1to
.os3
.os4tl
.ou2
.out3
.p2e2d2a
.p2i4e4
.p3re1s2e
.pe2t
.pe5te
.pe5tit
.ped5al
.ph4il2
.ph8i8l9a8n9t8h8r8o8p8ic.
.phi1la
.phila2n
.philan1t
.philant4hr4
.philanthrop3ic
.pi2t
.pio5n4
.pr2
.pr8e8s8e8n8ts.
.pr8e8s8e8nt.
.pr8o8j8e8c8ts.
.pr8o8j8e8ct.
.pre3m
.presen1t
.presen4t4s2
.pro1je
.pro5j
.proje2c1t
.projec4t1s2
.r2i4g
.ra1t2io
.ra2n
.ra4c
.ran4t
.ratio2n4
.ratio5n1a
.re1c2i
.re1co
.re1f
.re1fo
.re2cog
.re3tri
.re5mit
.re5stat
.re8c8i9p8r8o8c8i8ty.
.re8f9o8r9m8a9t8i8on.
.re8t9r8i9b8u9t8i8on.
.re9c8o8g9n8i9z8a8n8ce.
.rec2ip
.rec3ogniz
.recipr2
.recipr2oc
.recipro1ci
.recipro2c1it
.reciproci1ty
.recog1ni
.recogniza1
.recogniza2n
.ree2
.refo2r
.refor1m
.refor1ma
.reforma1t2io
.reformatio2n
.res1ta
.res2
.res2t
.retr4ib
.retri3bu1t2io
.retrib4u1t2i
.retributio2n
.ri2t5u
.ro4q
.ros5t
.row5d
.ru4d
.s1ci
.s1ta
.s2h2
.s2tab
.s3ing4
.s4y2
.se2n
.se5r2ie4
.sel1l5
.ser1i
.si2
.st4
.sta5b2l2
.t4i4n5k2
.ta9b8le.
.tab2l2
.te1na
.te4
.th2
.ti1m5o5
.ti2
.til4
.ting4
.to1n4a
.to2n
.to2u5s
.to4p
.top5i
.tou2
.tr4ib
.trib5ut
.u1n1a
.u2n1e
.u4n5k2
.un1de
.un3ce
.un3u4
.un5o
.under5
.up3
.ure3
.us5a2
.ve5r1a
.ven4de
.wi2
.wil2
.wil5i
.ye4
1bat
1bel
1bil
1c2us
1c4l4
1ca
1cen
1ci
1co
1cy
1d2a
1d2i1v
1d2io
1d4i3a
1den
1di1na
1do
1dr
1du
1e4f1f
1ex3p
1fa
1fi
1fo
1fy
1g2i4a
1ga
1gen
1geo
1gle
1go
1gr
1gy
1hea2d1
1ho2us
1je
1k2no
1kee
1l4ine
1len1t
1lut
1ly
1ma
1men
1mo
1mu
1na
1nen
1nes
1nou2
1o1gis
1o1gy
1p2l2
1p4or
1pa
1phy
1pos
1room
1s2io
1s2iv
1sis
1so
1su
1t2i1a
1t2io
1t2iv
1ta
1tan1ta3
1tee
1ten1t
1teo
1ter1i
1tim
1tiz
1to
1tra
1tu
1ty
1va
1wo2
1zo
2a2r
2adi
2ale
2ang
2b1b
2b3if
2b5s2
2bf
2bt
2c1it
2c1t
2c5ah
2ce.
2cen4e
2ch
2cim
2cin
2cog
2d1ed
2d1ly
2d1s2
2d3a4b
2d3lo
2d5of
2dag
2de.
2e1b
2e2d2a
2e2re.
2e2ss
2er1b
2ero
2est4r
2f3ic.
2f3s
2fed
2fin
2ft
2g5y3n
2gam
2ge.
2ged
2gue
2h1n
2i1a
2i1ci
2i1no
2i1t2io
2i2n1s2
2i4n1n2
2id
2ie4
2ig
2il1it
2in.
2in4th
2ine
2ini
2int.
2io
2ip
2is.
2is1c
2ite
2ith
2iv
2l1b
2l1n2
2l1s2
2l1w
2l3h
2ld
2lf
2lm
2lout
2lp
2lys4
2mab
2mah
2med
2mes
2mh
2n1a2b
2n1s2
2ne.
2ned
2nes.
2nest
2o2g5y3n
2ok
2ond
2oph
2p1s2
2p1t
2p2ed
2p3k2
2p3n
2que.
2r2ed
2rab
2re.
2s1ab
2s1in
2s1m
2s1pa
2s3g
2s5peo
2sh.
2sper
2ss
2st.
2t1b
2t1ed
2t1f
2t1in
2t1n2
2t2ig
2t3up.
2t4h1s2
2tab
2taw
2th.
2ti2b
2tl
2tof
2trim
2tyl
2ui2
2us
2v1a4b
2vil
2wac
2z1i
2ze
3a3g4o4g
3alyz
3ana1ly
3away
3b2i3t2io
3b2ie4
3bet
3bit5u1a
3bod
3boo2
3bu1t2io
3c2i1a
3c4ul1tu2
3c4ut
3cei2
3cel1l
3cen1t
3cenc
3cep
3ces1si
3chemi
3chit
3cho2
3cil1i
3cin2at
3cun
3d2id
3dat
3demic
3di2c1t
3di2ne.
3dle.
3dled
3dles.
3do.
3dos
3dox
3efit
3fu
3g2us
3g4in.
3g4ir
3g4o4g
3gal1i
3giz
3glo
3go.
3guar2d
3gun
3he2a2r
3hol4e
3hood
3i4s3f
3ka.
3l2e2ss
3l4and
3l4er1i
3l4ik
3lenc
3lerg2
3ley
3li2di
3ligh
3lo.
3log1ic
3logu
3m4ind
3men1t
3mest2i
3mil3i1a
3mo2us
3mum
3n2i1t2io
3n4i1a
3naut
3neo
3net1ic
3noe
3nomic
3noun
3nu3it
3nu4n
3ogniz
3oncil
3oper1a
3orrh4
3p2i1o
3p4edi
3pare
3pay
3pe4a
3pede
3phiz
3phob
3phone
3piec
3pla2n
3pr2e2ss
3quer
3quet
3ra1phy
3ri1mo
3s2i1t2io
3s4c2ie4
3s4on.
3sanc
3se2c1t
3sh2i4p
3si2de.
3som
3sph4er
3store
3syl
3t2ini
3t2us
3t4eu
3t4ise
3ta.
3tel.
3ten2a2n
3tenc
3tend
3tex
3the4t
3ti2ne.
3tien
3tle.
3tled
3tles.
3tum
3ture
3u1fa
3v2iv
3v2ok
3vat
3ver2se
3vol2v
3w4ise
3y1sis
3y2a2r4
4a1du
4a1ma
4a2ci
4a2lm
4a2lys4
4ab.
4abr
4ag4eu
4ag4l2
4aldi4
4allic
4an1to
4and
4ao
4aphi
4as.
4ath
4ati.
4b1d
4b1m
4b1o1ra
4b3h
4b3n
4b5w
4be.
4be2d
4be5m
4bes4
4bp
4brit
4bu1ta
4c3re1ta
4c3s2
4c4i5i4
4c5u1t2iv
4ca1t2iv
4cag4
4calo
4cas4y
4ce1den
4ce1s4a2
4ced.
4ceni
4ch.
4ch1in
4ch3ab
4ch4ed
4cier
4cip4ic
4cipe4
4cis1t2i
4cis1ta
4cl2a2r
4clic
4cor1b
4cutr
4d1f
4d1n4
4d3l2e2ss
4d5la
4d5lu
4d5out
4da1t2iv
4da1to
4da2f
4dary
4dee.
4dey
4dr2ai2
4drow
4dry
4duc4t1s2
4duct.
4dup
4e1do
4e2t1n2
4e4n1n2
4e4n3z
4ed3d4
4edi
4egal
4ella
4eno
4enth1es
4er2tl
4er3n2it
4er4and
4er4ati.
4erene
4erit
4eru
4es2h
4es2to
4eu
4f1f
4f3ical
4f4a4ma
4f5b
4f5p
4fa1to
4fag
4fd
4fe.
4fe1ca
4fh
4fi1ly
4fi4c3s2
4ficate
4fm
4fn
4fu1ta
4fug
4g1g2
4g3o3n1a
4g3ra1phy
4g4eno
4ga1t2iv
4gano4
4gaz
4ge1ly
4ge1to
4geny
4gra1d2a
4gray
4gress.
4grit
4gu4t
4h1l4
4h1m
4h1s2
4h5p
4hk
4hr4
4i1cr
4i1t2i1a
4i2ch
4i2f3ic.
4i2ft
4i2l1n2
4i2s1s
4i2tic
4i3ta.
4i4n1l
4i4nk2
4i4t3t2
4i5i4
4i5w
4ian4t
4ianc
4ic2a2r
4icam
4iceo
4if.
4igi
4ik
4imet
4imit
4in1ga
4in1go
4in1gu
4inav
4ind
4inge
4ingi
4iny
4io.
4ir
4is4k2
4is4m1s2
4ise
4istral
4ita5m
4itis
4ito2n
4itz.
4iy
4iz2a2r2
4jes2ty
4jes4t2ie4
4k1ly
4k1s2
4k3ley
4l1c2
4l1g4
4l1r
4l4i4l
4l4iq
4la1t2iv
4latel2i4
4lav
4len.
4leye
4li4c3s2
4lict.
4lj
4lof
4lov
4lt
4lup
4ly1b
4lya
4m1b
4m1f
4m1l
4m1n
4m1p
4m1s2
4m2ith
4m2ok
4m3r
4m5c
4ma2ld
4map
4mati3za1
4me.
4med.
4mene
4mk
4mo5ra.
4mocr
4mt
4mup
4mw
4n1b4
4n1h4
4n1l
4n1n2
4n3o2d
4na4lt
4nac.
4nare
4ne1sp
4nene
4nes4w2
4nk2
4nog
4nop
4nos2c
4nz
4o5r2i3a
4oa
4op4erag
4oscopi
4oth
4p1b
4p1m
4p1p
4p4h1s2
4pe.
4pf
4pg
4ph.
4pl2ig
4r2i1ci
4raril
4rh.
4rhal
4rs2
4s1er.
4s1wo2
4s3cei2
4s3f
4s3p2i1o
4s4ed
4s5b
4s5d
4scopy5
4se.
4se1me
4sen2tl
4sen4t1d
4senc
4ser3vo
4sh1w
4si1ly
4sig1n4a
4ske
4sov
4sp4ot
4st3w4
4stry
4sv
4sy1c
4t1d
4t1g
4t1m
4t1p
4t1s2
4t1wa
4t1wo2
4t2e2ss
4t3t2
4t4a2ci
4t4h1l4
4ta2f4
4talk
4tar1c
4tare
4tat1ic
4tc
4te.
4te1nes
4tea2t
4tes.
4tey
4th4il2
4thea
4thoo2
4ti4m1p
4tick1
4to2do4
4tono
4tony
4tout
4tri4c3s2
4trony
4tue
4tuf4
4tv
4tya
4tz
4u1t2i
4u2l1s2
4u2l3m
4u4te.
4uab
4uk
4ul1tu2
4ura.
4utel
4uten
4v3i1den
4ve.
4ved
4ves.
4vi1ti
4vi1ty
4vi4na
4ving
4vo1tee
4vv4
4wt
4y3h
4z1z2
4zb
4zm
5a5lys1t
5a5si4t
5alyt
5anniz
5ba.
5ble1sp
5bor.
5bore
5bori
5bos4
5bust
5by.
5c2i1no
5c2r2ed
5c4i2f3ic.
5cel.
5ch2ini
5ch2io
5cha4n1ic
5chi2ne.
5ciz
5clare
5colo
5crat.
5crat1ic
5cri1ti
5cul2i
5d2ini
5da.
5dav4
5day
5dem.
5der3m4
5di.
5di3en
5disi
5doe
5dren
5drupli
5dyn
5e1gy
5ef2i1c4i
5elec
5emniz
5eniz
5erick1
5erniz
5erwau
5ey1c
5eye.
5f2a2r
5fe2c1t
5fer1r4
5fi1na
5fi3c2i1a
5fic2ie4
5fo2n
5g2io
5g2iv
5g4i2n1s2
5gal.
5ge1si
5gi.
5gi3c2i1a
5gies.
5glas
5goe
5goo2
5gos.
5gra4ph.
5graph1ic
5gui5t
5hand.
5haz
5i3n2i1t2io
5i5r2iz
5i5tick1
5icap
5icra
5ie5ga
5iron.
5izon1t
5ja
5judg
5k2ic
5ki.
5le2ne.
5le4g1g2
5leg.
5lesq
5less.
5lic2io
5ligate
5lit3i1ca
5lo4pe.
5long
5los.
5los5o1phy
5los5o3phiz
5lu1mi
5lum3n4i1a
5ma3n4i1a
5mag1n
5mate
5me3d4i3a
5met3ric
5mi.
5moc5ra1tiz
5mu4lt
5n2is.
5neck1
5nege
5ni2ne.
5nol1o1gis
5nop5o5l2i
5ocrit
5ommend
5p2us
5paga4n
5pathic
5ph2ie4
5phis1t2i
5phoni
5phu
5pi2di
5po4g
5pod.
5poin1t
5poun
5pr2i4e4
5pre1c2i
5pute
5r4igi
5rea2v
5ri5c2id
5rima2n
5rina.
5riph
5role.
5root
5rynge
5s4m2ith
5s4tick1
5sa3t2io
5sack1
5sai2
5saw
5sc4in4d
5se2l2f
5se5um
5sei2
5selv
5sev
5sex
5shev
5si1u
5si2di
5si2ne.
5side4s2
5sio2n
5siz
5sol2v
5soph1ic
5sp4ai2
5st4and
5st4ir
5stat.
5stock1
5stone
5stra2tu
5t2u3i2
5t4er3n2it
5tab5o5l1iz
5te2c1t
5te2l1s2
5ter3d
5th4i4nk2
5thod3ic
5ti2di
5tigu
5tiq
5tisti1ca
5tour
5tr2i3a
5tri3c2i1a
5turi
5u5tiz
5ulche2
5v2e2re.
5v2il1it
5va.
5vi2a2n
5vi2d1ed
5vi2de.
5vi2di
5vide4s2
5vo.
5vo4l2t
5ynx
5zl
a1ca
a1do
a1dr
a1ga
a1ge4o
a1j
a1len1t
a1ly
a1na
a1nes
a1p4or
a1pa
a1pos
a1so
a1su
a1t2io
a1to
a1tr
a1vor
a2c1in
a2c1t
a2ch
a2d
a2d1s2
a2f
a2go
a2gue
a2i1n5o
a2ini
a2ite
a2ld
a2m5ab
a2mo
a2n
a2n1s2
a2nest
a2p1s2
a2p2l2
a2s4ab
a2ss
a2t5i5b
a2ta
a2tab
a2tom
a2tu
a2ty
a2us
a2va
a2z1i
a3c2ie4
a3c2io
a3d2io
a3d4i3a
a3dit
a3du2c
a3ha
a3he
a3ho
a3ic.
a3n2a2r
a3n2ip
a3n4eu
a3nati
a3nen
a3ni1u
a3nies
a3ph4er
a3pi2tu
a3pu
a3ree
a3ri5et
a3roo2
a3si1b
a3sic
a4c2a2r
a4f1f4
a4gab
a4gy
a4h4l4
a4i4n
a4l2a2r
a4lent2i
a4ly.
a4m1p
a4m5a1to
a4ma3tis
a4n1ic
a4n1n2
a4nk2
a4pilla
a4rs2
a4soc
a4t1s2
a4t3t2
a4t5ue
a4tog
a4top
a4tos2
a4ut5en
a4z1z2
a5ba2n
a5bal
a5ceou2
a5che4t
a5di1u
a5guer
a5i1a
a5le5o
a5log.
a5mo2n
a5n2ine
a5nee
a5nim1i
a5nur
a5r2e2ss
a5ra1t2io
a5rade
a5rame1te
a5rau
a5roni
a5sia.
a5t2i1a
a5ter1na
a5the2n
a5va2n
ab2i5a
ab2l2
ab3ul
ab5erd
ab5i2t5ab
ab5lat
ab5o5l1iz
ab5rog
abe2
abi1ta
abi2t
abol2i
ac1er
ac3ul
ac4um
ac5ard
ac5aro
ac5rob
ache2
act5if2
ad1d4
ad2ie4
ad3i1ca
ad3ow
ad4d1in
ad4le
ad4su
ad5er.
ad5ra2n
ad5um
adi4er
ae4r
aer1i
aer2i4e4
ag1i
ag1n
ag3o3ni
ag5el1l
ag5ul
aga4n
ago2n2
ai2
ai5ly
ain5in
ait5en
ak1en
al1i
al1l
al2i1a
al2i4e4
al2le
al3a2d
al3end
al4ia.
al5ab
al5lev
all2i
am1in
am2a2r
am2i4no
am3ag
am3ic
am5asc
am5er1a
am5i1ly
am5if
ama5ra
amo2r
amor5i
amp5en
an1de
an1dl
an1do
an1gl2
an1im
an1in
an1k1l
an1su
an1t
an1ta
an2at
an2ie4
an2sa2
an2sp
an2tr
an3age
an3ar3c
an3dis1
an3i3f
an3i4o
an3is2h
an3it
an3u1a
an3ul
an4dow
an4ime
an4kli
an4oth5
an4s1co
an4s1n4
an4st
an4su2r
an4t2ie4
an4tw4
an5e2st.
an5ot
anar4i
ande4s2
ang5ie4
ano4
ans3po
ans4c
ant2i
anta2l4
ap2a2r4
ap2se
ap3i1ta
ap3i2n
ap5at
ap5er3o
ap5ill2a2r
ap5o1la
apil1l
apo4c5
apor5i
apos3t
aps5e4s
aqu2
aque5
ar1b
ar1c
ar1f
ar1i
ar1m
ar1r4
ar2adi
ar2an4g
ar2ch
ar2i1na
ar2i3a
ar2ie4
ar2iz
ar2mi
ar2p
ar2s2h
ar3a2c1t
ar3al
ar3cha
ar3en1t
ar3i1o
ar3i2a2n
ar3q
ar4at
ar4cha2n
ar4dr
ar4f4l2
ar4fi
ar4im
ar4sa2
ar5a1t2iv
ar5adis1
ar5av4
ar5d2ine
ar5eas
ar5i2al
ar5in2at
ar5o5d
ara2d
ara2n
ara3p
aram3et
araw4
arbal4
ard1in4
ard2i
aro2n
arre4
as1t4r
as2h
as2i1a
as3an1t
as3ten
as4l2
as4s2h
as5ph
asa2
asa2n
ashi4
ask2
ask3i
asu1r5a
asu2r
at1ic
at1ta
at3ab2l2
at3alo
at3e1go
at3en.
at3er1a
at3est
at3i1tu
at3if2
at3u1ra
at3ul
at4ho
at4sk2
at4tag
at4th
at5ac
at5ap
at5e2ch
at5ev
at5om2iz
at5rop
at5te
at5u1a
ata2l
ate5c
ateg4
ater5n
ath2e
ath5em
ath5om
atio1n1a
atio2n
ation5a2r
au1th
au3gu
au3r
au4b
au4l2
au5si1b
augh3
aun5d
av1i
av2ie4
av3ag4
av3er1a
av3ig
av4e4no
av5ern
av5ery
av5oc
avi4er
aw3i2
aw4ly
aws4
ax3i
ax4i5c
ax4id
ay5al
aye4
ays4
az2ie4
az2z5i
azi4er
b1j
b1so
b1v
